Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to  the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Super-
vision, for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of
$8,781,722.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of $11,682
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the State Board of Parole
and Post-Prison Supervision.
SECTION 3.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5528 (SB 5528-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 10, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 18, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5528 (SB 5528-A) Page 2